Utah statutes.
10-3-819.   Bonds required.
The elected officers of each municipality and the treasurer in cities of the
first and second class before taking office shall execute a bond with good and
sufficient sureties, payable to the municipality in such amounts as are herein
provided, conditioned for the faithful performance of the duties of the
respective officers and the payment of all monies received by such officer
according to law and the ordinances of the municipality.  All other officers
of any municipality may, by resolution or ordinance, be required to furnish a
personal bond with good and sufficient sureties or corporate surety bond
payable to the municipality in such penal sum as the resolution or ordinance
may establish, conditioned for the faithful performance of the duties of their
office and the payment of all monies received by such officers according to
law and the ordinances of the municipality, or such officers may be included
within public employee blanket bonds at such amounts as may be determined by
the governing body.
